Washington statutes.
RCW 43.20.270

Governor's interagency coordinating council on health disparities—Action plan—Statewide policy.

The legislature finds that women and people of color experience significant disparities from men and the general population in education, employment, healthful living conditions, access to health care, and other social determinants of health. The legislature finds that these circumstances coupled with lower, slower, and less culturally appropriate and gender appropriate access to needed medical care result in higher rates of morbidity and mortality for women and persons of color than observed in the general population. Health disparities are defined by the national institute[s] of health as the differences in incidence, prevalence, mortality, and burden of disease and other adverse health conditions that exist among specific population groups in the United States.

It is the intent of the Washington state legislature to create the healthiest state in the nation by striving to eliminate health disparities in people of color and between men and women. In meeting the intent of chapter 239, Laws of 2006, the legislature creates the governor's interagency coordinating council on health disparities. This council shall create an action plan and statewide policy to include health impact reviews that measure and address other social determinants of health that lead to disparities as well as the contributing factors of health that can have broad impacts on improving status, health literacy, physical activity, and nutrition.

[ 2006 c 239 s 1.]